Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 6.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska45-1206
Other remedies available.

The Nebraska
Construction Prompt Pay Act shall not modify the remedies available to any
person under the terms of a contract in existence prior to October 1, 2010,
or by any other statute.

Laws 2010, LB552, § 6.